Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-302
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Motor Vehicle Registration Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 60-302.01 to 60-360 shall be used.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 2;

Laws 2007, LB286, § 21;

Laws 2008, LB756, § 6;

Laws 2010, LB650, § 21;

Laws 2011, LB163, § 17;

Laws 2012, LB1155, § 8;

Laws 2015, LB231, § 7;

Laws 2016, LB783, § 2;

Laws 2017, LB263, § 24;

Laws 2018, LB909, § 39;

Laws 2019, LB156, § 7;

Laws 2024, LB1317, § 60;

Laws 2025, LB398, § 11;

Laws 2026, LB972, § 38.
July 18, 2026